Utah statutes.
78B-15-611.   Proceeding before birth.

A proceeding to determine parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child, but may not be concluded until after the birth of the child.  The following actions may be taken before the birth of the child:

(1)  service of process;

(2)  discovery; and

(3)  except as prohibited by Section 78B-15-502, collection of specimens for genetic testing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

